Wyoming, session 2025, SF0010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 3-3-108(a)(intro) and (b) and
14-2-202 are amended to read:
3-3-108. Payment or delivery of property in lieu of
conservatorship.
(a) Any person under a duty to pay or deliver money
or personal property to a minor for whom no conservator has
been appointed may pay not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000.00) twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) per
annum or may deliver property of a value not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000.00) twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000.00) to:
(b) The payment or the delivery provided in W.S.
3-3-108 this section shall not be made if the person has
actual knowledge that a conservator has been appointed or
proceedings for appointment of a conservator of the estate
of the minor are pending.
14-2-202. Payment or delivery to parent of minor's
estate not exceeding $25,000; duty of parent; settlement
agreements on behalf of minors.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0010
ENROLLED ACT NO. 80, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) Money or other property not exceeding three
thousand dollars ($3,000.00) twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000.00) in value belonging to a minor having no
guardian of his estate may be paid or delivered to a parent
entitled to the custody of the minor to hold for the minor,
upon written assurance verified by the oath of the parent
that the total estate of the minor does not exceed three
thousand dollars ($3,000.00) twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000.00) in value. The written receipt of the parent
shall be an acquittance of the person making the payment or
delivery of money or other property.
(b) It is the duty of the parent to apply the funds
received under subsection (a) of this section to the use
and benefit of the minor.
(c) A parent, guardian or conservator of a minor may
enter into a settlement or compromise on behalf of the
minor with a person against whom the minor has a claim
without first seeking court approval and without first
establishing a guardianship or conservatorship for the
minor if:
(i) A guardian or conservator has not been
previously appointed for the minor to represent the minor;
(ii) The minor is not emancipated under W.S.
14-1-201 through 14-1-206;
(iii) The total amount of the settlement or
compromise to be paid to the minor is not greater than
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00);
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0010
ENROLLED ACT NO. 80, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) The moneys paid under the settlement
agreement or compromise are paid:
(A) To the parent, guardian or conservator
of the minor; or
(B) Into a trust or other account held for
the benefit of the minor.
(v) The parent, guardian or conservator of the
minor attests in an affidavit that the person has made a
reasonable inquiry into the minor's claim and that:
(A) The total amount of the minor's claim
is not greater than twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000.00), excluding fees, costs and all other expenses
incident to the claim; and
(B) To the best of the parent's, guardian's
or conservator's knowledge:
(I) The minor will be fully
compensated by the settlement or compromise; or
(II) It is unlikely that the minor
will be able to obtain additional amounts from the party
entering into the settlement agreement or compromise with
the minor.
(vi) The parent, guardian or conservator of the
minor will apply the funds received to the use and benefit
of the minor.
(d) A settlement or compromise entered into in
compliance with subsection (c) of this section shall, upon
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0010
ENROLLED ACT NO. 80, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
signature of the parent, guardian or conservator entering
into the agreement on the minor's behalf, be binding on the
minor without the need for further court approval or review
and shall have the same force and effect as if the minor
were a competent adult entering into the settlement or
compromise.
(e) A minor shall have a cause of action against a
parent, guardian or conservator who fails to manage or
apply all funds received for the sole benefit of the minor,
who fails to make a reasonable inquiry into the minor's
claim, who falsely states that the minor's claim is not
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) to
settle the claim under this section or who otherwise fails
to comply with the requirements of this section in settling
a claim on behalf of the minor.
Section 2. This act shall only apply to settlements
or compromises entered into for minors on and after the
effective date of this act.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0010
ENROLLED ACT NO. 80, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5